Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.040

Letters of office.

(1) The court shall issue letters of guardianship to a guardian on filing by the guardian of an acceptance of appointment.

(2) The court shall issue letters of conservatorship to a conservator on filing by the conservator of an acceptance of appointment and filing of any required bond or compliance with any other verified receipt required by the court.

(3) Limitations on the powers of a guardian or conservator or on the property subject to conservatorship must be included on the form prescribed by RCW 11.130.660.

(4) The court at any time may limit the powers conferred on a guardian or conservator. The court shall issue new letters of office to reflect the limitation.

(5) A guardian or conservator may not act on behalf of a person under guardianship or conservatorship without valid letters of office.

(6) The clerk of the superior court shall issue letters of guardianship or conservatorship in or substantially in the same form as set forth in RCW 11.130.660.

(7) Letters of office issued to a guardian or conservator who is a nonresident of this state must include the name and contact information for the resident agent of the guardian or conservator, appointed pursuant to RCW 11.130.090(1)(c).

(8) This chapter does not affect the validity of letters of office issued under *chapter 11.88 RCW prior to January 1, 2022.

[ 2021 c 65 s 104; 2020 c 312 s 303; 2019 c 437 s 108.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 11.88 RCW was repealed by 2020 c 312 s 904, effective January 1, 2022.

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.